Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-309
Cattle or sheep; hides; removal by other than owner; prohibited; exception.

It shall be unlawful for any person other than the owner or his agent or employee, to skin or remove from the carcass the skin, hide or pelt of any neat cattle or sheep found dead, except when such stock is killed by railroad trains, when the employees of such railroads may remove the hides from stock so killed.

Laws 1879, § 8, p. 70;

R.S.1913, § 103;

C.S.1922, § 111;

C.S.1929, § 54-308;

R.S.1943, § 54-309.